Illinois, session 104th, HB4289.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 18-185 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/18-185)7    Sec. 18-185. Short title; definitions. This Division 5 8may be cited as the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law. As 9used in this Division 5: 10    "Consumer Price Index" means the Consumer Price Index for 11All Urban Consumers for all items published by the United 12States Department of Labor. 13    "Extension limitation" means (a) the lesser of 5% or the 14percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index during the 1512-month calendar year preceding the levy year or (b) the rate 16of increase approved by voters under Section 18-205. 17    "Affected county" means a county of 3,000,000 or more 18inhabitants or a county contiguous to a county of 3,000,000 or 19more inhabitants. 20    "Taxing district" has the same meaning provided in Section 211-150, except as otherwise provided in this Section. For the 221991 through 1994 levy years only, "taxing district" includes 23only each non-home rule taxing district having the majority of   HB4289- 2 -LRB104 16840 HLH 30250 b1its 1990 equalized assessed value within any county or 2counties contiguous to a county with 3,000,000 or more 3inhabitants. Beginning with the 1995 levy year, "taxing 4district" includes only each non-home rule taxing district 5subject to this Law before the 1995 levy year and each non-home 6rule taxing district not subject to this Law before the 1995 7levy year having the majority of its 1994 equalized assessed 8value in an affected county or counties. Beginning with the 9levy year in which this Law becomes applicable to a taxing 10district as provided in Section 18-213, "taxing district" also 11includes those taxing districts made subject to this Law as 12provided in Section 18-213. 13    "Aggregate extension" for taxing districts to which this 14Law applied before the 1995 levy year means the annual 15corporate extension for the taxing district and those special 16purpose extensions that are made annually for the taxing 17district, excluding special purpose extensions: (a) made for 18the taxing district to pay interest or principal on general 19obligation bonds that were approved by referendum; (b) made 20for any taxing district to pay interest or principal on 21general obligation bonds issued before October 1, 1991; (c) 22made for any taxing district to pay interest or principal on 23bonds issued to refund or continue to refund those bonds 24issued before October 1, 1991; (d) made for any taxing 25district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued to 26refund or continue to refund bonds issued after October 1,   HB4289- 3 -LRB104 16840 HLH 30250 b11991 that were approved by referendum; (e) made for any taxing 2district to pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued 3before October 1, 1991 for payment of which a property tax levy 4or the full faith and credit of the unit of local government is 5pledged; however, a tax for the payment of interest or 6principal on those bonds shall be made only after the 7governing body of the unit of local government finds that all 8other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 9payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 10lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 11issued by the commission before October 1, 1991, to pay for the 12building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 13contracts entered into before October 1, 1991; (h) made for 14payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under the 15Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act to finance 16construction projects initiated before October 1, 1991; (i) 17made for payments of principal and interest on limited bonds, 18as defined in Section 3 of the Local Government Debt Reform 19Act, in an amount not to exceed the debt service extension base 20less the amount in items (b), (c), (e), and (h) of this 21definition for non-referendum obligations, except obligations 22initially issued pursuant to referendum; (j) made for payments 23of principal and interest on bonds issued under Section 15 of 24the Local Government Debt Reform Act; (k) made by a school 25district that participates in the Special Education District 26of Lake County, created by special education joint agreement   HB4289- 4 -LRB104 16840 HLH 30250 b1under Section 10-22.31 of the School Code, for payment of the 2school district's share of the amounts required to be 3contributed by the Special Education District of Lake County 4to the Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund under Article 7 of 5the Illinois Pension Code; the amount of any extension under 6this item (k) shall be certified by the school district to the 7county clerk; (l) made to fund expenses of providing joint 8recreational programs for persons with disabilities under 9Section 5-8 of the Park District Code or Section 11-95-14 of 10the Illinois Municipal Code; (m) made for temporary relocation 11loan repayment purposes pursuant to Sections 2-3.77 and 1217-2.2d of the School Code; (n) made for payment of principal 13and interest on any bonds issued under the authority of 14Section 17-2.2d of the School Code; (o) made for contributions 15to a firefighter's pension fund created under Article 4 of the 16Illinois Pension Code, to the extent of the amount certified 17under item (5) of Section 4-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; 18(p) made for road purposes in the first year after a township 19assumes the rights, powers, duties, assets, property, 20liabilities, obligations, and responsibilities of a road 21district abolished under the provisions of Section 6-133 of 22the Illinois Highway Code; (q) made under Section 4 of the 23Community Mental Health Act to provide the necessary funds or 24to supplement existing funds for community mental health 25facilities and services, including facilities and services for 26the person with a developmental disability or a substance use   HB4289- 5 -LRB104 16840 HLH 30250 b1disorder; and (r) made for the payment of principal and 2interest on any bonds issued under the authority of Section 317-2.11 of the School Code or to refund or continue to refund 4those bonds. 5    "Aggregate extension" for the taxing districts to which 6this Law did not apply before the 1995 levy year (except taxing 7districts subject to this Law in accordance with Section 818-213) means the annual corporate extension for the taxing 9district and those special purpose extensions that are made 10annually for the taxing district, excluding special purpose 11extensions: (a) made for the taxing district to pay interest 12or principal on general obligation bonds that were approved by 13referendum; (b) made for any taxing district to pay interest 14or principal on general obligation bonds issued before March 151, 1995; (c) made for any taxing district to pay interest or 16principal on bonds issued to refund or continue to refund 17those bonds issued before March 1, 1995; (d) made for any 18taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 19to refund or continue to refund bonds issued after March 1, 201995 that were approved by referendum; (e) made for any taxing 21district to pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued 22before March 1, 1995 for payment of which a property tax levy 23or the full faith and credit of the unit of local government is 24pledged; however, a tax for the payment of interest or 25principal on those bonds shall be made only after the 26governing body of the unit of local government finds that all   HB4289- 6 -LRB104 16840 HLH 30250 b1other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 2payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 3lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 4issued by the commission before March 1, 1995 to pay for the 5building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 6contracts entered into before March 1, 1995; (h) made for 7payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under the 8Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act to finance 9construction projects initiated before October 1, 1991; (h-4) 10made for stormwater management purposes by the Metropolitan 11Water Reclamation District of Greater Chicago under Section 12 12of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act; (h-8) made 13for payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under 14Section 9.6a of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District 15Act to make contributions to the pension fund established 16under Article 13 of the Illinois Pension Code; (i) made for 17payments of principal and interest on limited bonds, as 18defined in Section 3 of the Local Government Debt Reform Act, 19in an amount not to exceed the debt service extension base less 20the amount in items (b), (c), and (e) of this definition for 21non-referendum obligations, except obligations initially 22issued pursuant to referendum and bonds described in 23subsections (h) and (h-8) of this definition; (j) made for 24payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under 25Section 15 of the Local Government Debt Reform Act; (k) made 26for payments of principal and interest on bonds authorized by   HB4289- 7 -LRB104 16840 HLH 30250 b1Public Act 88-503 and issued under Section 20a of the Chicago 2Park District Act for aquarium or museum projects and bonds 3issued under Section 20a of the Chicago Park District Act for 4the purpose of making contributions to the pension fund 5established under Article 12 of the Illinois Pension Code; (l) 6made for payments of principal and interest on bonds 7authorized by Public Act 87-1191 or 93-601 and (i) issued 8pursuant to Section 21.2 of the Cook County Forest Preserve 9District Act, (ii) issued under Section 42 of the Cook County 10Forest Preserve District Act for zoological park projects, or 11(iii) issued under Section 44.1 of the Cook County Forest 12Preserve District Act for botanical gardens projects; (m) made 13pursuant to Section 34-53.5 of the School Code, whether levied 14annually or not; (n) made to fund expenses of providing joint 15recreational programs for persons with disabilities under 16Section 5-8 of the Park District Code or Section 11-95-14 of 17the Illinois Municipal Code; (o) made by the Chicago Park 18District for recreational programs for persons with 19disabilities under subsection (c) of Section 7.06 of the 20Chicago Park District Act; (p) made for contributions to a 21firefighter's pension fund created under Article 4 of the 22Illinois Pension Code, to the extent of the amount certified 23under item (5) of Section 4-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; 24(q) made by Ford Heights School District 169 under Section 2517-9.02 of the School Code; (r) made for the purpose of making 26employer contributions to the Public School Teachers' Pension   HB4289- 8 -LRB104 16840 HLH 30250 b1and Retirement Fund of Chicago under Section 34-53 of the 2School Code; (s) made under Section 4 of the Community Mental 3Health Act to provide the necessary funds or to supplement 4existing funds for community mental health facilities and 5services, including facilities and services for the person 6with a developmental disability or a substance use disorder; 7and (t) made for the payment of principal and interest on any 8bonds issued under the authority of Section 17-2.11 of the 9School Code or to refund or continue to refund those bonds. 10    "Aggregate extension" for all taxing districts to which 11this Law applies in accordance with Section 18-213, except for 12those taxing districts subject to paragraph (2) of subsection 13(e) of Section 18-213, means the annual corporate extension 14for the taxing district and those special purpose extensions 15that are made annually for the taxing district, excluding 16special purpose extensions: (a) made for the taxing district 17to pay interest or principal on general obligation bonds that 18were approved by referendum; (b) made for any taxing district 19to pay interest or principal on general obligation bonds 20issued before the date on which the referendum making this Law 21applicable to the taxing district is held; (c) made for any 22taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 23to refund or continue to refund those bonds issued before the 24date on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 25taxing district is held; (d) made for any taxing district to 26pay interest or principal on bonds issued to refund or   HB4289- 9 -LRB104 16840 HLH 30250 b1continue to refund bonds issued after the date on which the 2referendum making this Law applicable to the taxing district 3is held if the bonds were approved by referendum after the date 4on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 5taxing district is held; (e) made for any taxing district to 6pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued before the 7date on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 8taxing district is held for payment of which a property tax 9levy or the full faith and credit of the unit of local 10government is pledged; however, a tax for the payment of 11interest or principal on those bonds shall be made only after 12the governing body of the unit of local government finds that 13all other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 14payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 15lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 16issued by the commission before the date on which the 17referendum making this Law applicable to the taxing district 18is held to pay for the building project; (g) made for payments 19due under installment contracts entered into before the date 20on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 21taxing district is held; (h) made for payments of principal 22and interest on limited bonds, as defined in Section 3 of the 23Local Government Debt Reform Act, in an amount not to exceed 24the debt service extension base less the amount in items (b), 25(c), and (e) of this definition for non-referendum 26obligations, except obligations initially issued pursuant to   HB4289- 10 -LRB104 16840 HLH 30250 b1referendum; (i) made for payments of principal and interest on 2bonds issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt 3Reform Act; (j) made for a qualified airport authority to pay 4interest or principal on general obligation bonds issued for 5the purpose of paying obligations due under, or financing 6airport facilities required to be acquired, constructed, 7installed or equipped pursuant to, contracts entered into 8before March 1, 1996 (but not including any amendments to such 9a contract taking effect on or after that date); (k) made to 10fund expenses of providing joint recreational programs for 11persons with disabilities under Section 5-8 of the Park 12District Code or Section 11-95-14 of the Illinois Municipal 13Code; (l) made for contributions to a firefighter's pension 14fund created under Article 4 of the Illinois Pension Code, to 15the extent of the amount certified under item (5) of Section 164-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; (m) made for the taxing 17district to pay interest or principal on general obligation 18bonds issued pursuant to Section 19-3.10 of the School Code; 19(n) made under Section 4 of the Community Mental Health Act to 20provide the necessary funds or to supplement existing funds 21for community mental health facilities and services, including 22facilities and services for the person with a developmental 23disability or a substance use disorder; and (o) made for the 24payment of principal and interest on any bonds issued under 25the authority of Section 17-2.11 of the School Code or to 26refund or continue to refund those bonds.   HB4289- 11 -LRB104 16840 HLH 30250 b1    "Aggregate extension" for all taxing districts to which 2this Law applies in accordance with paragraph (2) of 3subsection (e) of Section 18-213 means the annual corporate 4extension for the taxing district and those special purpose 5extensions that are made annually for the taxing district, 6excluding special purpose extensions: (a) made for the taxing 7district to pay interest or principal on general obligation 8bonds that were approved by referendum; (b) made for any 9taxing district to pay interest or principal on general 10obligation bonds issued before March 7, 1997 (the effective 11date of Public Act 89-718); (c) made for any taxing district to 12pay interest or principal on bonds issued to refund or 13continue to refund those bonds issued before March 7, 1997 14(the effective date of Public Act 89-718); (d) made for any 15taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 16to refund or continue to refund bonds issued after March 7, 171997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) if the bonds 18were approved by referendum after March 7, 1997 (the effective 19date of Public Act 89-718); (e) made for any taxing district to 20pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued before March 217, 1997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) for payment 22of which a property tax levy or the full faith and credit of 23the unit of local government is pledged; however, a tax for the 24payment of interest or principal on those bonds shall be made 25only after the governing body of the unit of local government 26finds that all other sources for payment are insufficient to   HB4289- 12 -LRB104 16840 HLH 30250 b1make those payments; (f) made for payments under a building 2commission lease when the lease payments are for the 3retirement of bonds issued by the commission before March 7, 41997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) to pay for the 5building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 6contracts entered into before March 7, 1997 (the effective 7date of Public Act 89-718); (h) made for payments of principal 8and interest on limited bonds, as defined in Section 3 of the 9Local Government Debt Reform Act, in an amount not to exceed 10the debt service extension base less the amount in items (b), 11(c), and (e) of this definition for non-referendum 12obligations, except obligations initially issued pursuant to 13referendum; (i) made for payments of principal and interest on 14bonds issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt 15Reform Act; (j) made for a qualified airport authority to pay 16interest or principal on general obligation bonds issued for 17the purpose of paying obligations due under, or financing 18airport facilities required to be acquired, constructed, 19installed or equipped pursuant to, contracts entered into 20before March 1, 1996 (but not including any amendments to such 21a contract taking effect on or after that date); (k) made to 22fund expenses of providing joint recreational programs for 23persons with disabilities under Section 5-8 of the Park 24District Code or Section 11-95-14 of the Illinois Municipal 25Code; (l) made for contributions to a firefighter's pension 26fund created under Article 4 of the Illinois Pension Code, to   HB4289- 13 -LRB104 16840 HLH 30250 b1the extent of the amount certified under item (5) of Section 24-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; (m) made under Section 4 of 3the Community Mental Health Act to provide the necessary funds 4or to supplement existing funds for community mental health 5facilities and services, including facilities and services for 6the person with a developmental disability or a substance use 7disorder; and (n) made for the payment of principal and 8interest on any bonds issued under the authority of Section 917-2.11 of the School Code or to refund or continue to refund 10those bonds. 11    "Debt service extension base" means an amount equal to 12that portion of the extension for a taxing district for the 131994 levy year, or for those taxing districts subject to this 14Law in accordance with Section 18-213, except for those 15subject to paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Section 18-213, 16for the levy year in which the referendum making this Law 17applicable to the taxing district is held, or for those taxing 18districts subject to this Law in accordance with paragraph (2) 19of subsection (e) of Section 18-213 for the 1996 levy year, 20constituting an extension for payment of principal and 21interest on bonds issued by the taxing district without 22referendum, but not including excluded non-referendum bonds. 23For park districts (i) that were first subject to this Law in 241991 or 1995 and (ii) whose extension for the 1994 levy year 25for the payment of principal and interest on bonds issued by 26the park district without referendum (but not including   HB4289- 14 -LRB104 16840 HLH 30250 b1excluded non-referendum bonds) was less than 51% of the amount 2for the 1991 levy year constituting an extension for payment 3of principal and interest on bonds issued by the park district 4without referendum (but not including excluded non-referendum 5bonds), "debt service extension base" means an amount equal to 6that portion of the extension for the 1991 levy year 7constituting an extension for payment of principal and 8interest on bonds issued by the park district without 9referendum (but not including excluded non-referendum bonds). 10A debt service extension base established or increased at any 11time pursuant to any provision of this Law, except Section 1218-212, shall be increased each year commencing with the later 13of (i) the 2009 levy year or (ii) the first levy year in which 14this Law becomes applicable to the taxing district, by the 15lesser of 5% or the percentage increase in the Consumer Price 16Index during the 12-month calendar year preceding the levy 17year. The debt service extension base may be established or 18increased as provided under Section 18-212. "Excluded 19non-referendum bonds" means (i) bonds authorized by Public Act 2088-503 and issued under Section 20a of the Chicago Park 21District Act for aquarium and museum projects; (ii) bonds 22issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt Reform 23Act; or (iii) refunding obligations issued to refund or to 24continue to refund obligations initially issued pursuant to 25referendum. 26    "Special purpose extensions" include, but are not limited   HB4289- 15 -LRB104 16840 HLH 30250 b1to, extensions for levies made on an annual basis for 2unemployment and workers' compensation, self-insurance, 3contributions to pension plans, and extensions made pursuant 4to Section 6-601 of the Illinois Highway Code for a road 5district's permanent road fund whether levied annually or not. 6The extension for a special service area is not included in the 7aggregate extension. 8    "Aggregate extension base" means the taxing district's 9last preceding aggregate extension as adjusted under Sections 1018-135, 18-215, 18-230, 18-206, and 18-233. Beginning with 11levy year 2022, for taxing districts that are specified in 12Section 18-190.7, the taxing district's aggregate extension 13base shall be calculated as provided in Section 18-190.7. An 14adjustment under Section 18-135 shall be made for the 2007 15levy year and all subsequent levy years whenever one or more 16counties within which a taxing district is located (i) used 17estimated valuations or rates when extending taxes in the 18taxing district for the last preceding levy year that resulted 19in the over or under extension of taxes, or (ii) increased or 20decreased the tax extension for the last preceding levy year 21as required by Section 18-135(c). Whenever an adjustment is 22required under Section 18-135, the aggregate extension base of 23the taxing district shall be equal to the amount that the 24aggregate extension of the taxing district would have been for 25the last preceding levy year if either or both (i) actual, 26rather than estimated, valuations or rates had been used to   HB4289- 16 -LRB104 16840 HLH 30250 b1calculate the extension of taxes for the last levy year, or 2(ii) the tax extension for the last preceding levy year had not 3been adjusted as required by subsection (c) of Section 18-135.4    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a taxing 5district provided a property tax abatement under subsection 6(j) of Section 10-20 of the Energy Community Reinvestment Act 7in a levy year prior to levy year 2027, and the taxing district 8was subject to this Law in that prior levy year, then, for levy 9year 2027, the district's aggregate extension base shall be 10calculated as through the district's aggregate extension for 11the levy year in which the abatement was granted included the 12amount of the abatement. Beginning in levy year 2028, if a 13taxing district provided a property tax abatement under 14subsection (j) of Section 10-20 of the Energy Community 15Reinvestment Act in the immediately preceding levy year, then 16the district's aggregate extension base for the applicable 17levy year shall be calculated as through the district's 18aggregate extension for the levy year in which the abatement 19was granted included the amount of the abatement. 20    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for levy year 212012, the aggregate extension base for West Northfield School 22District No. 31 in Cook County shall be $12,654,592. 23    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 24purpose of calculating the limiting rate for levy year 2023, 25the last preceding aggregate extension base for Homewood 26School District No. 153 in Cook County shall be $19,535,377.   HB4289- 17 -LRB104 16840 HLH 30250 b1    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for levy year 22022, the aggregate extension base of a home equity assurance 3program that levied at least $1,000,000 in property taxes in 4levy year 2019 or 2020 under the Home Equity Assurance Act 5shall be the amount that the program's aggregate extension 6base for levy year 2021 would have been if the program had 7levied a property tax for levy year 2021. 8    "Levy year" has the same meaning as "year" under Section 91-155. 10    "New property" means (i) the assessed value, after final 11board of review or board of appeals action, of new 12improvements or additions to existing improvements on any 13parcel of real property that increase the assessed value of 14that real property during the levy year multiplied by the 15equalization factor issued by the Department under Section 1617-30, (ii) the assessed value, after final board of review or 17board of appeals action, of real property not exempt from real 18estate taxation, which real property was exempt from real 19estate taxation for any portion of the immediately preceding 20levy year, multiplied by the equalization factor issued by the 21Department under Section 17-30, including the assessed value, 22upon final stabilization of occupancy after new construction 23is complete, of any real property located within the 24boundaries of an otherwise or previously exempt military 25reservation that is intended for residential use and owned by 26or leased to a private corporation or other entity, (iii) in   HB4289- 18 -LRB104 16840 HLH 30250 b1counties that classify in accordance with Section 4 of Article 2IX of the Illinois Constitution, an incentive property's 3additional assessed value resulting from a scheduled increase 4in the level of assessment as applied to the first year final 5board of review market value, and (iv) any increase in 6assessed value due to oil or gas production from an oil or gas 7well required to be permitted under the Hydraulic Fracturing 8Regulatory Act that was not produced in or accounted for 9during the previous levy year. In addition, the county clerk 10in a county containing a population of 3,000,000 or more shall 11include in the 1997 recovered tax increment value for any 12school district, any recovered tax increment value that was 13applicable to the 1995 tax year calculations. 14    "Qualified airport authority" means an airport authority 15organized under the Airport Authorities Act and located in a 16county bordering on the State of Wisconsin and having a 17population in excess of 200,000 and not greater than 500,000. 18    "Recovered tax increment value" means, except as otherwise 19provided in this paragraph, the amount of the current year's 20equalized assessed value, in the first year after a 21municipality terminates the designation of an area as a 22redevelopment project area previously established under the 23Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act in the Illinois 24Municipal Code, previously established under the Industrial 25Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois Municipal Code, previously 26established under the Economic Development Project Area Tax   HB4289- 19 -LRB104 16840 HLH 30250 b1Increment Act of 1995, or previously established under the 2Economic Development Area Tax Increment Allocation Act, of 3each taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property in 4the redevelopment project area over and above the initial 5equalized assessed value of each property in the redevelopment 6project area. For the taxes which are extended for the 1997 7levy year, the recovered tax increment value for a non-home 8rule taxing district that first became subject to this Law for 9the 1995 levy year because a majority of its 1994 equalized 10assessed value was in an affected county or counties shall be 11increased if a municipality terminated the designation of an 12area in 1993 as a redevelopment project area previously 13established under the Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment 14Act in the Illinois Municipal Code, previously established 15under the Industrial Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois 16Municipal Code, or previously established under the Economic 17Development Area Tax Increment Allocation Act, by an amount 18equal to the 1994 equalized assessed value of each taxable 19lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property in the 20redevelopment project area over and above the initial 21equalized assessed value of each property in the redevelopment 22project area. In the first year after a municipality removes a 23taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property from a 24redevelopment project area established under the Tax Increment 25Allocation Redevelopment Act in the Illinois Municipal Code, 26the Industrial Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois Municipal   HB4289- 20 -LRB104 16840 HLH 30250 b1Code, or the Economic Development Area Tax Increment 2Allocation Act, "recovered tax increment value" means the 3amount of the current year's equalized assessed value of each 4taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property removed 5from the redevelopment project area over and above the initial 6equalized assessed value of that real property before removal 7from the redevelopment project area. 8    Except as otherwise provided in this Section, "limiting 9rate" means a fraction the numerator of which is the last 10preceding aggregate extension base times an amount equal to 11one plus the extension limitation defined in this Section and 12the denominator of which is the current year's equalized 13assessed value of all real property in the territory under the 14jurisdiction of the taxing district during the prior levy 15year. For those taxing districts that reduced their aggregate 16extension for the last preceding levy year, except for school 17districts that reduced their extension for educational 18purposes pursuant to Section 18-206, the highest aggregate 19extension in any of the last 3 preceding levy years shall be 20used for the purpose of computing the limiting rate. The 21denominator shall not include new property or the recovered 22tax increment value. If a new rate, a rate decrease, or a 23limiting rate increase has been approved at an election held 24after March 21, 2006, then (i) the otherwise applicable 25limiting rate shall be increased by the amount of the new rate 26or shall be reduced by the amount of the rate decrease, as the   HB4289- 21 -LRB104 16840 HLH 30250 b1case may be, or (ii) in the case of a limiting rate increase, 2the limiting rate shall be equal to the rate set forth in the 3proposition approved by the voters for each of the years 4specified in the proposition, after which the limiting rate of 5the taxing district shall be calculated as otherwise provided. 6In the case of a taxing district that obtained referendum 7approval for an increased limiting rate on March 20, 2012, the 8limiting rate for tax year 2012 shall be the rate that 9generates the approximate total amount of taxes extendable for 10that tax year, as set forth in the proposition approved by the 11voters; this rate shall be the final rate applied by the county 12clerk for the aggregate of all capped funds of the district for 13tax year 2012.14(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-587, eff. 5-28-24; 15103-591, eff. 7-1-24; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 104-417, eff. 168-15-25.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.